Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,135
Dwelling unit, defined.

Dwelling unit shall mean a single unit providing complete, independent living facilities for one or more persons including permanent provisions for living, sleeping, eating, cooking, and sanitation, or a single unit used by one or more persons for sleeping and sanitation pursuant to a work practice or labor agreement.

Laws 1981, LB 296, § 4.